Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-315
Board of trustees; utilities service; sale or lease.

The board of trustees is hereby empowered and authorized to make such contract of sale or lease of the whole or part of any water, light or heat plant now or hereafter constructed at any state college, and the purchase of water, heat and light, with any city, village or corporation at or near which is located any state college, as shall in the judgment of the board be to the best interest of said state college.

Laws 1913, c. 194, § 1, p. 572;

R.S.1913, § 7064;

C.S.1922, § 6699;

C.S.1929, § 85-308;

R.S.1943, § 85-315;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 11, p. 3202.